Utah statutes.
53-3-809.   Revocation of card for providing false information or altering
card.
The commissioner shall revoke and repossess the identification card of any
person who has:
(1)  furnished false or forged information or evidence in support of any
application for any identification card; or
(2)  altered any information or photograph on an identification card.
